Georgia, session 2025_26, HB440.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 440
- 1 -

25 LC 55 0484
16 PART I
17 SECTION 1-1.
18 This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Providing Effective Access to Cannabis
19 for Health (PEACH) Act."
20 PART II
21 SECTION 2-1.
22 Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to agriculture, is amended by
23 replacing "low THC oil" and "Low THC oil" with "medical cannabis" and "Medical
24 cannabis", respectively, wherever such terms occur in:
25 (1) Code Section 2-11-36, relating to seeds used in production of low THC oil;
26 (2) Code Section 2-23-9.2, relating to consumable hemp products, packaging, advertising,
27 and distribution; and
28 (3) Code Section 2-23-9.3, relating to location of retail establishments selling or
29 distributing consumable hemp products.
30 SECTION 2-2.
31 Article 9 of Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
32 access to medical cannabis, is amended by replacing "low THC oil" and "Low THC oil" with
33 "medical cannabis" and "Medical cannabis", respectively, and by replacing "Low THC Oil
34 Patient Registry" with "Medical Cannabis Patient Registry" wherever such terms occur in:
35 (1) Code Section 16-12-201, relating to prohibition against producing, growing,
36 manufacturing, or dispensing low THC oil or products;
37 (2) Code Section 16-12-203, relating to powers, duties, and responsibilities;
H. B. 440
- 2 -

25 LC 55 0484
38 (3) Code Section 16-12-204, relating to nontransferable designated university licenses to
39 produce low THC oil and products, research and reporting of collected information, and
40 license revocation;
41 (4) Code Section 16-12-206, relating to annual, nontransferable dispensing license,
42 adoption of rules, and fees;
43 (5) Code Section 16-12-210, relating to powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Georgia
44 Access to Medical Cannabis Commission, no undue burden on patients, and remission of
45 fees;
46 (6) Code Section 16-12-211, relating to class 1 production licenses, application fee,
47 revocation, and limitation on ownership;
48 (7) Code Section 16-12-212, relating to class 2 production licenses, application fees,
49 revocation, and limitation on ownership;
50 (8) Code Section 16-12-213, relating to tracking system requirements;
51 (9) Code Section 16-12-216, relating to Bureau of Investigation, Access to Medical
52 Cannabis Commission, and Composite Medical Board to jointly establish procedures to
53 ensure compliance;
54 (10) Code Section 16-12-217, relating to on-demand access to facilities, provision of
55 samples, testing, and secured transportation;
56 (11) Code Section 16-12-225, relating to criminal offenses and penalties;
57 (12) Code Section 16-12-226, relating to sales and use taxes applicable;
58 (13) Code Section 16-12-233, relating to contracts not against public policy;
59 (14) Code Section 16-12-235, relating to research in compliance with federal regulations;
60 and
61 (15) Code Section 16-12-235.1, relating to possession of low THC oil and products by
62 colleges and universities for research purposes, permitting requirements, and inspection.
H. B. 440
- 3 -

25 LC 55 0484
63 SECTION 2-3.
64 Chapter 1 of Title 51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general
65 provisions relative to torts, is amended by revising Code Section 51-1-29.6, relating to
66 liability of health care institutions and providers regarding low THC oil, as follows:
67 "51-1-29.6.
68 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
69 (1) 'Caregiver' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 31-2A-18.
70 (2) 'Health care Healthcare institution' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
71 Section 51-1-29.5.
72 (3) 'Health care Healthcare provider' means any person licensed, certified, or registered
73 under Chapter 9, 10A, 11, 11A, 26, 28, 30, 33, 34, 35, 39, or 44 of Title 43 or Chapter 4
74 of Title 26.
75 (4) 'Low THC oil Medical cannabis' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
76 Section 16-12-190.
77 (5) 'Product' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-200.
78 (b) A health care healthcare institution shall not be subject to any civil liability, penalty,
79 licensing sanction, or other detrimental action and a health care healthcare provider shall
80 not be subject to any civil liability, penalty, denial of a right or privilege, disciplinary
81 action by a professional licensing board, or other detrimental action for allowing an
82 individual or caregiver to possess, administer, or use low THC oil medical cannabis or
83 products on the premises of a health care healthcare institution or offices of a health care
84 healthcare provider, provided that the possession of such substance is in accordance with
85 the laws of this state."
H. B. 440
- 4 -

25 LC 55 0484
86 PART III
87 SECTION 3-1.
88 Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to offenses against
89 the public health and morals, is amended by revising Article 8, relating to regulation of low
90 THC oil, as follows:
91 "ARTICLE 8
92 16-12-190.
93 As used in this article, the term:
94 (1) 'Commission' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-200.
95 (2) 'Designated university' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
96 16-12-200.
97 (3) 'Georgia based college or university' means a college or university located in this
98 state that has a permit issued by the commission pursuant to Code Section 16-12-235.1
99 to possess medical cannabis or products.
100 (4) 'Independent laboratory' means a laboratory approved by the commission pursuant
101 to Code Section 16-12-217 to test medical cannabis or products.
102 (5) 'Licensee' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-200.
103 (6) 'Marijuana' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-13-21.
104 (7) 'Medical cannabis' means any plant within the genus Cannabis and any part of such
105 plant, including all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of
106 isomers, whether growing or not, that contains 'low THC oil' means an oil that contains
107 an amount of cannabidiol and not more than 5 percent by weight of tetrahydrocannabinol,
108 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, or a combination of tetrahydrocannabinol and
109 tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, which does not contain plant material exhibiting the external
H. B. 440
- 5 -

25 LC 55 0484
110 morphological features of the plant of the genus Cannabis. Such term shall not mean
111 products and that is produced in accordance with the provisions of Article 9 of this
112 chapter; provided, however, that such term shall not include:
113 (A) Drugs approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration under Section 505
114 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
115 (B) Hemp or hemp products, as such terms are defined in Code Section 2-23-3.
116 (8) 'Product' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-200.
117 16-12-191.
118 (a)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, it shall be lawful for any
119 person to possess, purchase, or have under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of
120 low THC oil if such substance 2.5 ounces or less of medical cannabis or a product or
121 products containing an equivalent amount of medical cannabis if such medical cannabis
122 or product or products is in a pharmaceutical container labeled by the manufacturer
123 indicating the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol therein and:
124 (A) Such person is registered with the Department of Public Health as set forth in Code
125 Section 31-2A-18 and has in his or her possession a registration card issued by the
126 Department of Public Health; or
127 (B) Such person has in his or her possession a registration card issued by another state
128 that allows the same possession of low THC oil medical cannabis as provided by this
129 state's law; provided, however, that such registration card shall not be lawful authority
130 when such person has been present in this state for 45 days or more.
131 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person who possesses,
132 purchases, or has under his or her control 20 fluid 2.5 ounces or less of low THC oil
133 medical cannabis or a product or products containing an equivalent amount of medical
134 cannabis without complying with paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be punished as
135 for a misdemeanor.
H. B. 440
- 6 -

25 LC 55 0484
136 (b)(1) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, it shall be lawful for any
137 person to possess, purchase, or have under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of
138 low THC oil if:
139 (A) Such person is involved in a clinical research program being conducted by the
140 Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia or any authorized clinical trial
141 or research study in this state or their authorized agent as:
142 (i) A program participant;
143 (ii) A parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a program participant;
144 (iii) An employee of the board of regents designated to participate in the research
145 program;
146 (iv) A program agent;
147 (v) A program collaborator and their designated employees;
148 (vi) A program supplier and their designated employees;
149 (vii) A program physician;
150 (viii) A program clinical researcher;
151 (ix) Program pharmacy personnel; or
152 (x) Other program medical personnel; and
153 (B) Such substance is in a pharmaceutical container labeled by the manufacturer
154 indicating the percentage of tetrahydrocannabinol therein.
155 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person who possesses,
156 purchases, or has under his or her control 20 fluid ounces or less of low THC oil without
157 complying with subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall
158 be punished as for a misdemeanor.
159 (c)(b) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person having
160 possession of, purchasing, or having under his or her control more than 20 fluid ounces of
161 low THC oil but less than 160 fluid ounces of low THC oil 2.5 ounces but less than 20
162 ounces of medical cannabis or a product or products containing an equivalent amount of
H. B. 440
- 7 -

25 LC 55 0484
163 medical cannabis or who manufactures, distributes, dispenses, sells, purchases, or possesses
164 with the intent to distribute low THC oil medical cannabis or products shall be guilty of a
165 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than
166 one year nor more than ten years, a fine not to exceed $50,000.00, or both.
167 (d)(c) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 13 of this title, any person who sells,
168 manufactures, delivers, brings into this state, purchases, or has possession of 160 or more
169 fluid ounces of low THC oil 20 or more ounces of medical cannabis or a product or
170 products containing an equivalent amount of medical cannabis shall be guilty of the felony
171 offense of trafficking in low THC oil medical cannabis and, upon conviction thereof, shall
172 be punished as follows:
173 (1) If the quantity of low THC oil medical cannabis is at least 160 fluid 20 ounces but
174 less than 31,000 fluid 3,875 ounces, by imprisonment for not less than five years nor
175 more than ten years and a fine not to exceed $100,000.00;
176 (2) If the quantity of low THC oil medical cannabis is at least 31,000 fluid 3,875 ounces
177 but less than 154,000 fluid 19,250 ounces, by imprisonment for not less than seven years
178 nor more than 15 years and a fine not to exceed $250,000.00; and
179 (3) If the quantity of low THC oil medical cannabis is 154,000 19,250 or more fluid
180 ounces, by imprisonment for not less than ten years nor more than 20 years and a fine not
181 to exceed $1 million.
182 (e) Subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section shall not apply to a person involved in a
183 research program being conducted by the Board of Regents of the University System of
184 Georgia or its authorized agent as an employee of the board of regents designated to
185 participate in such program, a program agent, a program collaborator and their designated
186 employees, a program supplier and their designated employees, a physician, clinical
187 researcher, pharmacy personnel, or other medical personnel.
188 (f)(d) Subsections (c) and (d) (a), (b), and (c) of this Code section shall not apply to a
189 designated university, pharmacy, or licensee under Article 9 of Chapter 12 of Title 16 the
H. B. 440
- 8 -

25 LC 55 0484
190 following entities and their employees, agents, or contractors, provided that such
191 possession, purchase, control, sale, manufacturing, distribution, or dispensing is solely
192 conducted in accordance with the provisions of and pursuant to Article 9 of Chapter 12 of
193 Title 16 this chapter:
194 (1) The commission;
195 (2) A designated university;
196 (3) A Georgia based college or university;
197 (4) An independent laboratory; or
198 (5) A licensee.
199 (g)(e) Nothing in this article shall require an employer to permit or accommodate the use,
200 consumption, possession, transfer, display, transportation, purchase, sale, or growing of
201 marijuana in any form, or to affect the ability of an employer to have a written zero
202 tolerance policy prohibiting the on-duty, and off-duty, use of marijuana, or prohibiting any
203 employee from having a detectable amount of marijuana in such employee's system while
204 at work."
205 SECTION 3-2.
206 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 16-12-200, relating to definitions
207 relative to access to medical cannabis, as follows:
208 "16-12-200.
209 As used in this article, the term:
210 (1) 'Applicant' means a corporate entity applying for a license pursuant to this article.
211 (2) 'Available capital' means corporate assets that are available to fund business
212 operations in the event a license is awarded pursuant to Part 2 of this article.
213 (2.1) 'Caregiver' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 31-2A-18.
214 (3) 'Class 1 production license' means a license to produce and manufacture low THC
215 oil and medical cannabis or products issued pursuant to Code Section 16-12-211.
H. B. 440
- 9 -

25 LC 55 0484
216 (4) 'Class 2 production license' means a license to produce and manufacture low THC
217 oil and medical cannabis or products issued pursuant to Code Section 16-12-212.
218 (5) 'Commission' means the Georgia Access to Medical Cannabis Commission created
219 pursuant to Code Section 16-12-202.
220 (6) 'Designated universities' means the University of Georgia and Fort Valley State
221 University.
222 (7) 'Designated university license' means a license issued by the commission pursuant
223 to this article to a designated university to, separately or jointly, produce, manufacture,
224 and purchase low THC oil and medical cannabis or products in accordance with this
225 article.
226 (8) 'Dispense' means the sale or provision of low THC oil and medical cannabis or
227 products to registered patients by a dispensing licensee.
228 (9) 'Dispensing license' means a specialty license issued by the State Board of Pharmacy
229 or the commission pursuant to Code Section 16-12-206 to dispense low THC oil and
230 medical cannabis or products to registered patients.
231 (10) 'Grow' means cultivating and harvesting cannabis for use in producing low THC oil
232 and medical cannabis or products.
233 (10.1) 'Hemp products' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 2-23-3.
234 (11) 'Licensee' means any business, or owner of such business, with a valid license
235 issued pursuant to this article.
236 (12) 'Low THC oil' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-190.
237 (13) 'Manufacture' means to process cannabis to produce low THC oil and medical
238 cannabis or products.
239 (13) 'Medical cannabis' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
240 Section 16-12-190.
241 (14) 'Owner' means any person who directly or indirectly owns, actually or beneficially,
242 or controls 5 percent or greater of interests of the applicant or any licensee. In the event
H. B. 440
- 10 -

25 LC 55 0484
243 that one person owns a beneficial right to interests and another person holds the voting
244 rights with respect to such interests, then both shall be considered an owner of such
245 interests.
246 (15) 'Product' means all products that are derived from, or made by, processing medical
247 cannabis and that are prepared in a form available for commercial sale low THC oil
248 delivered through an oil, tincture, transdermal patch, lotion, or capsule, except as
249 prohibited by Code Section 16-12-234, but not including hemp products or any food
250 products infused with medical cannabis low THC oil, including, but not limited to,
251 cookies, candies, or edibles.
252 (16) 'Registered patient' means an individual who is legally authorized to possess and use
253 low THC oil and products pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-18 has been issued a
254 registration card.
255 (16.1) 'Registration card' means a card or other document authorizing an individual to
256 possess and use medical cannabis or products that has been issued by:
257 (A) The Department of Public Health pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-18; or
258 (B) The governmental agency of another state that allows the same possession of
259 medical cannabis or products as provided by this state's law; provided, however, that
260 such a card or other document shall not be lawful authority to possess and use medical
261 cannabis or products in this state when the individual to whom it was issued has been
262 present in this state for 45 days or more.
263 (17) 'Tracking system' means a seed-to-sale tracking system to track marijuana that is
264 grown, processed, manufactured, transferred, stored, or disposed of and low THC oil and
265 medical cannabis or products that are transferred, stored, sold, dispensed, or disposed of
266 pursuant to this article."
H. B. 440
- 11 -

25 LC 55 0484
267 SECTION 3-3.
268 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 16-12-215, relating to limitations
269 on locations, advertising or marketing prohibited, and information available to physicians,
270 as follows:
271 "16-12-215.
272 (a) No licensee shall operate in any location, whether for cultivation, harvesting, and
273 processing of marijuana or for processing, manufacturing, packaging, or distributing low
274 THC oil medical cannabis or products, within a 3,000 foot radius of a covered entity,
275 measured from property boundary to property boundary. No dispensing licensee may
276 operate in any location within a 1,000 foot radius of a covered entity, measured from
277 property boundary to property boundary. Notwithstanding the provisions of this
278 subsection, local governments may, via use of existing zoning powers otherwise provided
279 by law, allow dispensing licensees only to locate in places other than those provided in this
280 subsection so long as such modification is needed to allow retail outlets to be established
281 to service registered patients residing within such local jurisdiction. As used in this
282 subsection, the term 'covered entity' means a public or private school; an early care and
283 education program as defined in Code Section 20-1A-2; or a church, synagogue, or other
284 place of public religious worship, in existence prior to the date of licensure of such licensee
285 by the commission or State Board of Pharmacy. This subsection shall not apply to any
286 entity that holds a dispensing license issued by the State Board of Pharmacy.
287 (b) No licensee shall advertise or market low THC oil medical cannabis or products to
288 registered patients or the public; provided, however, that a licensee shall be authorized to
289 provide information regarding its low THC oil and medical cannabis or products directly
290 to physicians."
H. B. 440
- 12 -

25 LC 55 0484
291 SECTION 3-4.
292 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 16-12-224, relating to limitation
293 on ownership by member or former member of the commission, limitation on physicians
294 involvement, and identification when contributing to political campaigns, as follows:
295 "16-12-224.
296 (a) No current member of the commission, or former member of the commission for a
297 period of five years from the date such individual ceased to be a member, shall own,
298 operate, have a financial interest in, or be employed by a low THC oil medical cannabis or
299 product manufacturer or distributor, including any licensee under this part.
300 (b) No physician who, presently or during the period of such business relationship,
301 certifies individuals to the commission pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-18 for the use of
302 low THC oil and medical cannabis or products to treat certain conditions shall own,
303 operate, have a financial interest in, or be employed by a low THC oil medical cannabis or
304 product manufacturer or distributor, including any licensee under this part. This subsection
305 shall not prohibit a physician from furnishing a registered patient or his or her caregiver,
306 upon request, with the names of low THC oil medical cannabis and product manufacturers
307 or distributors. Any physician violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.
308 (c) A licensee that makes a campaign contribution pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 5 of
309 Title 21 shall identify itself as a licensee under this part to the recipient of such campaign
310 contribution."
311 SECTION 3-5.
312 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Sections 16-12-230 and 16-12-231,
313 relating to requirements for dispensing low THC oil and products and exemptions from
314 arrest, prosecutions, or penalty, respectively, as follows:
H. B. 440
- 13 -

25 LC 55 0484
315 "16-12-230.
316 (a) Low THC oil and Medical cannabis or products shall only be dispensed to registered
317 patients or caregivers in this state by a dispensing licensee or directly from the commission
318 pursuant to this article.
319 (b) A pharmacist who dispenses low THC oil medical cannabis or products shall seek and
320 review information on a registered patient from the prescription drug monitoring program
321 data base established pursuant to Code Section 16-13-57 prior to dispensing low THC oil
322 medical cannabis or products to the registered patient.
323 16-12-231.
324 The following persons and entities, when acting in accordance with the provisions of this
325 article, shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, or any civil or administrative penalty,
326 including a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a professional licensing board, or be
327 denied any right or privilege, for the medical use, prescription, administration,
328 manufacture, distribution, or transport of low THC oil medical cannabis or products:
329 (1) A registered patient who is in possession of an amount of low THC oil medical
330 cannabis or products authorized under Code Section 16-12-191 or such patient's
331 caregiver, parent, or guardian;
332 (2) A physician who certifies a patient to the Department of Public Health as being
333 diagnosed with a condition or in a hospice program and authorized to use low THC oil
334 medical cannabis or products for treatment pursuant to Code Section 31-2A-18;
335 (3) A pharmacist or pharmacy that dispenses or provides low THC oil medical cannabis
336 or products to a registered patient or such patient's caregiver, parent, or guardian;
337 (4) The commission or its employees or contractors associated with the production of
338 low THC oil medical cannabis or products in accordance with this article;
H. B. 440
- 14 -

25 LC 55 0484
339 (5) A designated university, an employee of a designated university, or any other person
340 associated with the production of low THC oil medical cannabis or products in
341 accordance with this article; and
342 (6) A licensee or an An employee, contractor, or agent of a licensee with proper
343 identification associated with the production, manufacture, distribution, transport, or sale
344 of low THC oil medical cannabis or products in accordance with this article."
345 SECTION 3-6.
346 Said chapter is further amended by repealing in its entirety Code Section 16-12-234, relating
347 to unlawful ways to ingest low THC oil or products, and designating such Code section as
348 reserved.
349 SECTION 3-7.
350 Article 2 of Chapter 13 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
351 regulation of controlled substances, is amended in Code Section 16-13-21, relating to
352 definitions, by revising paragraph (16) as follows:
353 "(16) 'Marijuana' means all parts of the plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or
354 not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of such plant, and every
355 compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant, its seeds,
356 or resin, but shall not include samples as described in subparagraph (P) of paragraph (3)
357 of Code Section 16-13-25; shall not include the completely defoliated mature stalks of
358 such plant, fiber produced from such stalks, oil, or cake, or the completely sterilized
359 samples of seeds of the plant which are incapable of germination; and shall not include
360 hemp or hemp products, as such terms are defined in Code Section 2-23-3, or medical
361 cannabis or products, as such terms are defined in Code Sections 16-12-190 and
362 16-12-200, respectively, when in the possession or control of a person authorized to
363 possess and control such medical cannabis or products under the provisions of Article 8
H. B. 440
- 15 -

25 LC 55 0484
364 or Article 9 of Chapter 12 of this title. Such term shall not include products approved by
365 the federal Food and Drug Administration under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug,
366 and Cosmetic Act."
367 SECTION 3-8.
368 Said article is further amended in Code Section 16-13-25, relating to Schedule I, by revising
369 subparagraph (P) of paragraph (3) as follows:
370 "(P) Tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, or a combination of
371 tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid which does not contain plant
372 material exhibiting the external morphological features of the plant of the genus
373 Cannabis, but not including such substance when found in hemp or hemp products, as
374 such terms are defined in Code Section 2-23-3, or in medical cannabis or products, as
375 such terms are defined in Code Sections 16-12-190 and 16-12-200, respectively, when
376 in the possession or control of a person authorized to possess or control such medical
377 cannabis or products under the provisions of Article 8 or Article 9 of Chapter 12 of this
378 title. Tetrahydrocannabinols do not include products approved by the federal Food and
379 Drug Administration under Section 505 of the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;"
380 SECTION 3-9.
381 Article 1 of Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
382 general provisions relative to the Department of Public Health, is amended by revising Code
383 Section 31-2A-18, relating to low THC oil patient registry, registration cards, reports, waiver
384 forms, and annual review and recommendations, as follows:
385 "31-2A-18.
386 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
387 (1) 'Board' means the Georgia Composite Medical Board.
388 (2) 'Caregiver' means:
H. B. 440
- 16 -

25 LC 55 0484
389 (A) A the parent, guardian, or legal custodian of an individual who is less than 18 years
390 of age or the legal guardian of an adult;
391 (B) An adult who is designated by a patient as being an individual authorized to
392 provide assistance, and who is willing to provide such assistance, with purchasing,
393 possessing, and administering medical cannabis or products for such patient's use; or
394 (C) A healthcare institution as defined in Code Section 51-1-29.6 where a patient is
395 receiving health or medical care for a condition and where such institution agrees to
396 allow such patient to possess and use medical cannabis or products on such institution's
397 premises.
398 (3) 'Condition' means:
399 (A) Cancer, when such disease is diagnosed as end stage or the treatment produces
400 related wasting illness or recalcitrant nausea and vomiting;
401 (B) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end
402 stage;
403 (C) Seizure disorders related to a diagnosis of epilepsy or trauma related head injuries;
404 (D) Multiple sclerosis, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
405 (E) Crohn's disease Inflammatory bowel disease;
406 (F) Mitochondrial disease;
407 (G) Parkinson's disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
408 (H) Sickle cell disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
409 (I) Tourette's syndrome, when such syndrome is diagnosed as severe;
410 (J) Autism spectrum disorder, when such disorder is diagnosed for a patient who is at
411 least 18 years of age, or severe autism, when diagnosed for a patient who is less than
412 18 years of age;
413 (K) Epidermolysis bullosa;
414 (L) Alzheimer's disease, when such disease is diagnosed as severe or end stage;
H. B. 440
- 17 -

25 LC 55 0484
415 (M) Acquired immune deficiency syndrome, when such syndrome is diagnosed as
416 severe or end stage;
417 (N) Peripheral neuropathy, when such symptoms are diagnosed as severe or end stage;
418 (O) Post-traumatic stress disorder resulting from direct exposure to or the witnessing
419 of a trauma for a patient who is at least 18 years of age; or
420 (P) Intractable pain;
421 (Q) Lupus; or
422 (R) Any other condition, disease, disorder, or syndrome for which:
423 (i) An opioid has been or could be prescribed pursuant to generally accepted medical
424 practice;
425 (ii) A physician determines, in his or her clinical opinion, that a patient with such
426 condition, disease, disorder, or syndrome would likely receive medical, palliative, or
427 therapeutic benefits from the use of medical cannabis or products; or
428 (iii) A patient is receiving inpatient or outpatient hospice care.
429 (4) 'Department' means the Department of Public Health.
430 (5) 'Intractable pain' means pain that has a cause that cannot be removed and for which,
431 according to generally accepted medical practice, the full range of pain management
432 modalities appropriate for the patient has been used for a period of at least six months
433 without adequate results or with intolerable side effects.
434 (6) 'Low THC oil Medical cannabis' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
435 Section 16-12-190.
436 (7) 'Physician' means an individual licensed to practice medicine pursuant to Article 2
437 of Chapter 34 of Title 43.
438 (8) 'Product' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 16-12-200.
439 (9) 'Registry' means the Low THC Oil Medical Cannabis Patient Registry.
440 (b) There is established within the department the Low THC Oil Medical Cannabis Patient
441 Registry.
H. B. 440
- 18 -

25 LC 55 0484
442 (c) The purpose of the registry is to provide a registration of individuals and caregivers
443 who have been issued registration cards. The department shall establish procedures and
444 promulgate rules and regulations for the establishment and operation of the registration
445 process and dispensing of registry cards to individuals and caregivers.
446 (d) The department shall issue a registration card to any individual who has been certified
447 to the department by his or her physician as being diagnosed with a condition or is an
448 inpatient or outpatient in a hospice program and has been authorized by such physician to
449 use low THC oil medical cannabis or products as treatment. The department shall issue a
450 registration card to a caregiver when the circumstances warrant the issuance of such card.
451 The board shall establish procedures and promulgate rules and regulations to assist
452 physicians in providing required uniform information relating to certification and any other
453 matter relating to the issuance of certifications. In promulgating such rules and regulations,
454 the board shall require that physicians have a doctor-patient relationship when certifying
455 an individual as needing low THC oil medical cannabis or products and physicians shall
456 be required to be treating such individual for the specific condition requiring such treatment
457 or be treating such individual in a hospice program. A physician shall seek and review
458 information about a patient from the prescription drug monitoring program data base
459 established pursuant to Code Section 16-13-57 prior to certifying such patient to the
460 department as being diagnosed with a specific condition that requires the use of low THC
461 oil medical cannabis or products as treatment. A registration card issued pursuant to this
462 Code section shall be valid for five years from the date of issuance so long as the individual
463 patient or caregiver remains eligible for receipt of such card based on the continued
464 diagnosis of such individual patient with a condition. If the individual patient or caregiver
465 requests delivery of the registration card, the department shall deliver such card either via
466 certified mail or by secure electronic means, including email, whichever delivery method
467 is specified by such patient or caregiver.
H. B. 440
- 19 -

25 LC 55 0484
468 (e) The board shall require physicians to issue semiannual reports to the board. Such
469 reports shall require physicians to provide information, including, but not limited to,
470 dosages recommended for a particular condition, patient clinical responses, levels of
471 tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinolic acid present in test results, compliance,
472 responses to treatment, side effects, and drug interactions. Such reports shall be used for
473 research purposes to determine the efficacy of the use of low THC oil medical cannabis or
474 products as a treatment for conditions.
475 (f) Information received and records kept by the department for purposes of administering
476 this Code section shall be confidential; provided, however, that such information shall be
477 disclosed, subject to the provisions of the federal Health Insurance Portability and
478 Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and any regulations promulgated thereunder:
479 (1) Upon written request of an individual or caregiver registered pursuant to this Code
480 section for information related to the individual or his or her caregiver;
481 (2) To peace officers and prosecuting attorneys for the purpose of:
482 (A) Verifying that an individual in possession of a registration card is registered
483 pursuant to this Code section; or
484 (B) Determining that an individual in possession of low THC oil medical cannabis or
485 products is registered pursuant to this Code section; and
486 (3) To government entities and other entities for statistical, research, educational,
487 instructional, drug abuse prevention, or grant application purposes after removing all
488 personal identifiers from the health information and removing all information that could
489 be used to identify prescribers.
490 (g) The board shall develop a waiver form that will advise that the use of cannabinoids and
491 THC containing products have not been approved by the FDA and the clinical benefits are
492 unknown and may cause harm. Any patient or caregiver shall sign such waiver prior to his
493 or her approval for registration.
H. B. 440
- 20 -

25 LC 55 0484
494 (h) The board, in coordination with the Department of Public Health, shall annually review
495 the conditions included in paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section and
496 recommend additional conditions that have been shown through medical research to be
497 effectively treated with low THC oil medical cannabis or products. Such recommendations
498 shall include recommended dosages for a particular condition, patient responses to
499 treatment with respect to the particular condition, and drug interactions with other drugs
500 commonly taken by patients with the particular condition. Such recommendations shall
501 be made jointly by the board and the Department of Public Health to the General Assembly
502 no later than December 1 of each year."
503 PART IV
504 SECTION 4-1.
505 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 440
- 21 -